pl: Zgodny gwint mikrofonu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Inne
es: Rosca de micrófono compatible: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Otros
sk-SK: Kompatibilný závit pre mikrofón: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Iné
nb: Kompatibel mikrofontråd: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Annet
th: เธรดไมโครโฟนที่รองรับ: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; อื่นๆ
da: Kompatibel mikrofontråd: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Andet
ro-RO: Filet microfon compatibil: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Altele
el: Συμβατό σπείρωμα μικροφώνου: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Άλλο
en: Compatible microphone thread: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Other
bg-BG: Съвместима резба за микрофон: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Други
zh-TW: 相容麥克風螺紋: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; 其他
ja: 適合するマイクのネジ: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; その他
sv: Kompatibel mikrofontråd: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Övrigt
it: Filettatura del microfono compatibile: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Altro
cs: Kompatibilní závit mikrofonu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Jiné
hu: Kompatibilis mikrofonmenet: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Egyéb
lt-LT: Suderinamas mikrofono sriegis: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Kita
zh-CN: 适用麦克风线: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; 其他
pt-PT: Fio de microfone compatível: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Outro
vi: Ren micrô tương thích: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Khác
sl-SI: Združljiv navoj mikrofona: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Drugo
de: Kompatibles Mikrofongewinde: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Sonstiges
ko: 호환 가능한 마이크 스레드: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; 기타
nl: Compatibele microfoondraad: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Andere
pt-BR: Fio de microfone compatível: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Outro
fr: Câble de microphone compatible: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilni navoj mikrofona: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Ostalo
fi: Yhteensopiva mikrofonikierre: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Muu
ru: Совместимый тип резьбы микрофона: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Другое
tr: Uyumlu Mikrofon Kablosu: 1/4"-20; 3/8"-16; 5/8"-27; M10; M20; M6; Diğer